en: chia oil, chia seed oil
ca: oli de xia
da: chiaolie
de: Chiaöl
es: aceite de chía
fi: chiaöljy, chia-öljy, chia-siemenöljy
fr: huile de chia
hr: chia ulje
hu: chia olaj, chiamagolaj, chiamag olaj, chia mag olaj
it: olio di chia
ja: チアオイル
nl: chia-olie
sv: chiaolja

en: hazelnut oil
bg: лешниково олио
de: Haselnussöl
el: λάδι φουντουκιού
es: Aceite de avellana
fi: hasselpähkinäöljy
fr: huile de noisette
hr: biljna ulje lješnjaci
it: Olio di nocciole
nl: hazelnotenolie, hazelnootolie
tr: fındık yağı

en: virgin hazelnut oil
de: Natives Haselnussöl
fr: huile vierge de noisette
hr: djevičansko ulje lješnjaka
it: olio vergine di nocciole

en: cold pressed hemp oil
hr: hladno prešano konopljino ulje
it: olio di canapa spremuto a freddo

en: pistachio seed oil
de: Pistazienöl
fi: pistaasipähkinäöljy
fr: Huile de pistache
hr: ulje sjemenki pistacija
hu: pisztáciaolaj, pisztáciamag olaj
it: olio di semi di pistacchio

en: peanut oil or hazelnut oil
hr: ulje kikirikija ili ulje lješnjaka
hu: mogyoró olaj, Mogyoróolaj
it: olio di arachidi o olio di nocciole

en: sunflower oil, sunflower seed oil, sunflower vegetable oil
ar: زيت زهرة الشمس
az: Günəbaxan yağı
be: Сланечнікавы алей
bg: Слънчогледово олио, слънчогледово масло, масло слънчогледово, растително слънчогледово масло, слънчогледова мазнина
ca: oli de gira-sol, oli vegetal de gira-sol, oli de girasol, oli vegetal de girasol
cs: Slunečnicový olej
da: solsikkeolie
de: Sonnenblumenöl
el: ηλιέλαιο
es: aceite de girasol, aceite vegetal de girasol, aceite de semillas de girasol, aceite de maravilla
et: Päevalilleõli
eu: ekilore-olio
fa: روغن آفتاب‌گردان
fi: auringonkukkaöljy, auringonkukkaöljyä
fr: huile de tournesol, huile de graines de tournesol, huile tournesol, huile végétale de tournesol, graisses végétales de tournesol
gl: Aceite de xirasol
he: שמן חמניות
hr: suncokretovo ulje, suncokretovo ulja, suncokretno ulje, suncokretovo biljna ulja, pripravak suncokretovog ulja, ulje suncokreta
hu: napraforgóolaj, napraforgó olaj, napraforgó étolaj
id: Minyak biji bunga matahari
is: Sólblómaolía
it: olio di girasole, Olio di semi di girasole, olio vegetale di semi di girasole
ja: ひまわり油
kk: Күнбағыс майы
kn: ಸೂರ್ಯಕಾಂತಿ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
ko: 해바라기 기름
lt: Saulėgrąžų aliejus
lv: Saulespuķu eļļa
mk: Сончогледово масло
mr: Minyak bunga matahari
nb: solsikkeolje
nl: zonnebloemolie, plantaardige zonnebloemolie
nn: solsikkeolje
pl: Olej słonecznikowy, olej roślinny słonecznikowy, olej z pestek słonecznika, oleje roślinne słonecznikowy
pt: óleo de girassol, óleo vegetal de girassol
ro: ulei de floarea soarelui, Ulei de floarea-soarelui, ulei vegetal de floarea-soarelui
ru: подсолнечное масло, масло подсолнечное, масло растительное подсолнечное
sa: सूर्यकान्तितैलम्
sh: Suncokretovo ulje
sk: Slnečnicový olej
sl: Sončnično olje
sq: Vaji i lulediellit
sr: сунцокретово уље
sv: solrosolja, vegetabilisk solrosolja
te: పొద్దుతిరుగుడు నూనె
th: น้ำมันดอกทานตะวัน
tr: Ayçiçek yağı
tt: Көнбагыш мае
uk: Соняшникова олія
vi: Dầu hướng dương
zh: 葵花籽植物油

en: organic sunflower oil
da: økologisk solsikkeolie
de: biologische Sonnenblumöl
es: aceite de girasol orgánico, aceite de girasol organico
fi: luomuauringonkukkaöljy, luomu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol bio
hr: organsko suncokretovo ulje
hu: bio napraforgóolaj
it: olio di girasole biologico
nl: olie van biologische zonnebloempitten, olie van biologisch zonnebloempitten, biozonnebloemolie, bio zonnebloemolie

en: partially hydrogenated sunflower oil
bg: частично хидрогенирано слънчогледово масло, частично хидрогенирано слънчогледово олио
de: teilweise gehärtetes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite de girasol parcialmente hidrogenado
fi: osittain kovetettu auringonkukkaöljy, osittain hydrogenoitu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol partiellement hydrogénée
hr: djelomično hidrogenirano suncokretovo ulje
hu: részben hidrogénezett napraforgóolaj
it: olio di girasole parzialmente idrogenato
nl: zonnebloemolie gedeeltelijk gehard

en: fully hydrogenated sunflower oil
bg: напълно хидрогенирано слънчогледово масло, напълно хидрогенирано слънчогледово олио
de: ganz gehärtetes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite de girasol totalmente hidrogenado
fi: kokonaan kovetettu auringonkukkaöljy, täysin hydrogenoitu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol entièrement hydrogénée
hr: potpuno hidrogenirano suncokretovo ulje
hu: teljesen hidrogénezett napraforgóolaj
it: oli totalmente idrogenati da girasole
nl: zonnebloemolie geheel gehard

en: non-hydrogenated sunflower oil
bg: нехидрогенирано слънчогледово масло, нехидрогенирано слънчогледово олио
de: ungehärtetes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite de girasol no hidrogenado
fi: kovettamaton auringonkukkaöljy, hydrogenoimaton auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol non hydrogénée, huile végétale de tournesol non hydrogénée
hr: nehidrogenirano suncokretovo ulje
hu: nem hidrogénezett napraforgóolaj
nl: zonnebloemolie ongehard
sv: ohärdad solrosolja

en: refined sunflower oil
bg: рафинирано слънчогледово олио, рафинирано слънчогледово масло
ca: oli refinat de gira-sol
de: Raffiniertes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite refinado de girasol, aceite de girasol refinado
fi: raffinoitu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol raffinée
hr: rafinirano suncokretovo ulje
hu: finomított napraforgóolaj, finomított napraforgó étolaj
it: oleo di girasole raffinato
pl: rafinowany olej słonecznikowy
pt: Óleo de girassol refinado
ro: ulei rafinat de floarea-soarelui
ru: масло подсолнечное рафинированное дезодорированное, масло подсолнечное рафинированное
sv: raffinerad solrosolja

en: high oleic sunflower
da: solsikkeolie med højt fedtsyreindhold
de: High-Oleic-Sonnenblumen, HO-Sonnenblumen
es: girasol alto oleico
fr: tournesol oléique
hr: visoko oleinskog suncokreta
it: girasole alto oleico
pl: wysoko oleinowy olej słonecznikowy

en: high oleic sunflower oil
bg: високоолеиново слънчогледово масло, високо олеиново слънчогледово олио
ca: oli refinat de gira-sol alt oleic, oli de gira-sol alt oleic, oli vegetal de gira-sol alt oleic
de: High Oleic-Sonnenblumenöl, High-Oleic-Sonnenblumenöl, Sonnenblumenöl mit hohem Fettsäureanteil, Sonnenblumenöl hoch erhitzbar
es: aceite de girasol alto oleico, aceite refinado de girasol alto oleico
fr: huile de tournesol à haute teneur en acide oléique, huile de tournesol à teneur élevée en acide oléique, huile de tournesol oléique, huile de tournesol haut oléique
hr: suncokretovo ulje s visokim udjelom oleinske kiseline, visokooleinsko suncokretovo ulje, suncokretovo ulje s visokim sadržajem oleinske kiseline
it: olio di girasole alto oleico
nl: high oleic zonnebloemolie
pt: óleo de girassol com alto teor em ácido oleico, óleo refinado de girassol alto oleíco
ru: масло подсолнечное высокоолеиновое рафинированное дезодорированное

en: cold pressed sunflower oil
bg: студено пресовано слънчогледово масло, нерафинирано студено пресовано слънчогледово масло, нерафинирано слънчогледово масло
de: kaltgepresstes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite de girasol prensado en frio
fi: kylmäpuristettu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol pressée à froid
hr: hladno prešano suncokretovo ulje
hu: hidegen sajtolt napraforgóolaj
it: olio di girasole spremuto a freddo
nl: koudgeperste zonnebloemolie
pl: olej słonecznikowy tłoczony na zimno, tłoczony na zimno olej słonecznikowy
pt: óleo de girassol prensado a frio
ru: масло подсолнечное рафинированное дезодорированное вымороженное

en: deodorized sunflower oil
de: desodoriertes Sonnenblumenöl
es: aceite de girasol desodorizado
fi: deodorisoitu auringonkukkaöljy
fr: huile de tournesol désodorisée
hr: dezodorirano suncokretovo ulje
hu: szagtalanított napraforgóolaj
it: deodorato olio di semi di girasole
nl: ontgeurde zonnebloemolie

en: omega 9
de: Omega 9, Omega-9-Fettsäuren
hr: omega 9
it: omega 9

en: essential oil
af: Eteriese olie
ar: زيت عطري
az: Efir yağı
be: Эфірныя алеі
bs: Eterično ulje
ca: Oli essencial
cs: Czech
da: Æterisk olie
de: Ätherisches Öl, Ätherische Öle
el: Αιθέριο έλαιο
eo: volatila oleo
es: aceite esencial
et: eeterlik õli, eeterlikud õlid
fa: اسانس
fi: Eteerinen öljy
fr: huile essentielle
ga: Bláthola
gl: Aceite esencial
he: שמן אתרי
hi: वाष्पशील तेल
hr: eterična ulja
hu: illóolaj, illóolajok
hy: Եթերային յուղ
id: Minyak atsiri
io: Esencala oleo
it: olio essenziale, oli essenziali, olii essenziali
ja: 精油
jv: Lenga Atsiri
kk: Эфир майлары
ko: 방향유
lt: Eterinis aliejus
lv: Ēteriskās eļļas
mk: етерично масло
ml: സുഗന്ധ എണ്ണകൾ
nb: eteriske oljer
nl: etherische olie
nn: Norwegian Nynorsk
pl: Olejek eteryczny
pt: óleo essencial
ro: Ulei esențial
ru: Эфирные масла
sh: Eterično ulje
si: සගන්ධ තෙල්
sk: Éterický olej
sl: Dišavno olje
sv: Eterisk olja
ta: ஆவி எண்ணை
te: ఆవశ్యక నూనె
th: น้ำมันหอมระเหย
tr: Organik hidrosol
uk: Ефірні олії
uz: Efir moylari
vi: Tinh dầu
zh: 精油

en: orange essential oil, orange oil
bg: портокалово масло
da: appelsinolie
de: Orangenöl
es: aceite esencial de naranja, aceite esencial de piel de naranja
fi: appelsiiniöljy
fr: huile essentielle d'orange, huile d'orange
hr: eterično ulje naranče
hu: narancs illóolaj, narancsos illóolaj
it: olio essenziale di arancio
nb: appelsinolje
nl: sinaasappelolie
pl: olejek pomarańczowy
sv: apelsinolja

en: blood orange essential oil
de: Blutorangenöl
fr: huile essentielle d'orange sanguine
hr: eterično ulje crvene naranče
it: olio essenziale di arancia rossa